District of Columbia statutes.
38-121.01

District of Columbia Public Schools use of private funds.

(a)

The annual District of Columbia Public Schools (“DCPS”) budget submission shall identify and list all donations, whether monetary or gifts in kind, of $100,000 or more, donated to DCPS, in a single donation or in multiple donations by a benefactor, for its benefit or purpose, whether directly or indirectly.

(b)

The Mayor shall submit an annual report, along with the budget submission, on the use of non-government funds that specifies for each benefactor:

(1)

Name and address;

(2)

Amount of the planned or actual expenditure donation;

(3)

The intended use of the donation; and

(4)

The specific goods or services purchased on behalf of or donated to DCPS.

(c)

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “donation” means any gift, grant, devise, or bequest of any real or personal property, or other type of asset.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 4042, 57 DCR 6242

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4042 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 4041 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle E of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Use of Private Funds Reporting Requirement Act of 2010”.

Short Title